Ohio, session 136, SB324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 4773.01, 4773.02, 4773.03, and 4773.06 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 4773.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "General x-ray machine operator" means an individual who operates ionizing radiation-generating equipment in order to perform standard radiology procedures; whose performance of such procedures is limited to specific body sites; and who does not, to any significant degree, determine procedure positioning or the dosage of radiation to which a patient is exposed. (B) "Chiropractor" means an individual licensed under Chapter 4734. of the Revised Code to practice chiropractic. (C) "Ionizing radiation" means any electromagnetic or particulate radiation that interacts with atoms to produce ionization in matter, including x-rays, gamma rays, alpha and beta particles, high speed electrons, neutrons, and other nuclear particles. (D) "Physician" means an individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. (E) "Podiatrist" means an individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice podiatric medicine and surgery. (F) "Nuclear medicine technologist" means an individual who does all of the following: (1) Prepares and administers radio-pharmaceuticals to human beings; (2) Conducts in vivo or in vitro detection and measurement of radioactivity for medical purposes; (3) Documents orders for radio-pharmaceuticals in patient medical records. (G) "Radiation therapy technologist" means an individual who utilizes ionizing radiation-generating equipment, including therapy simulator radiation-generating equipment, for therapeutic purposes on human beings. "Radiation therapy technologist" is the same as a radiation therapist. (H) "Radiographer" means an individual who does all of the following in order to perform a comprehensive scope of radiology procedures on human beings: (1) Operates ionizing radiation-generating equipment; (2) Administers contrast; (3) Documents orders for contrast in patient medical records; (4) Determines procedure positioning; (5) Determines the dosage of ionizing radiation. (I) "Mechanotherapist" means an individual who holds a certificate issued under section 4731.15 of the Revised Code authorizing the individual to practice mechanotherapy. (J) "Certified nurse practitioner" has the same meaning as in section 4723.01 of the Revised Code. (K) "Physician assistant" means an individual licensed under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code to practice as a physician assistant. Sec. 4773.02. (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, no person shall practice or hold self out as a general x-ray machine operator, radiographer, radiation therapy technologist, or nuclear medicine technologist without a valid license issued under this chapter for the person's area of practice. (B) Division (A) of this section does not apply to any of the following: (1) A physician, podiatrist, mechanotherapist, or chiropractor, certified nurse practitioner, or physician assistant; (2) An individual licensed under Chapter 4715. of the Revised Code to practice dentistry, to practice as a dental hygienist, or to practice as a dental x-ray machine operator; (3) As specified in 42 C.F.R. 75, radiologic personnel employed by the federal government or serving in a branch of the armed forces of the United States; (4) Students engaging in any of the activities performed by basic x-ray machine operators, radiographers, radiation therapy technologists, and nuclear medicine technologists as an integral part of a program of study leading to receipt of a license issued under this chapter or Chapter 4715., 4723., 4730., 4731., or 4734. of the Revised Code. Sec. 4773.03. (A) Except as provided in division (G) of this section, each individual seeking a license to practice as a general x-ray machine operator, radiographer, radiation therapy technologist, or nuclear medicine technologist shall apply to the department of health on a form the department shall prescribe and provide. The application shall be accompanied by the appropriate license application fee established in rules adopted under section 4773.08 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as provided in division (G) of this section, the department shall review all applications received and issue the appropriate general x-ray machine operator, radiographer, radiation therapy technologist, or nuclear medicine technologist license to each applicant who meets all of the following requirements: (1) Is eighteen years of age or older; (2) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, passes the examination administered under section 4773.04 of the Revised Code for the applicant's area of practice; (3) Complies with any other licensing standards established in rules adopted under section 4773.08 of the Revised Code. (C) An applicant is not required to take a licensing examination if one of the following applies to the applicant: (1) The individual is applying for a license as a general x-ray machine operator and holds certification in that area of practice from the American registry of radiologic technologists or the American chiropractic registry of radiologic technologists. (2) The individual is applying for a license as a general x-ray machine operator and has successfully passed the anatomy modules examination offered by the American registry of radiologic technologists for the individual's intended practice area in a limited scope of practice in radiology. (3) The individual is applying for a license as a radiographer and holds certification in that area of practice from the American registry of radiologic technologists. (3)(4) The individual is applying for a license as a radiation therapy technologist and holds certification in that area of practice from the American registry of radiologic technologists. (4)(5) The individual is applying for a license as a nuclear medicine technologist and holds certification in that area of practice from the American registry of radiologic technologists or the nuclear medicine technology certification board. (5)(6) The individual holds a conditional license issued under section 4773.05 of the Revised Code and has completed the continuing education requirements established in rules adopted under section 4773.08 of the Revised Code. (D) A license issued under this section expires biennially on the license holder's birthday, except for an initial license which expires on the license holder's birthday following two years after it is issued. For an initial license, the fee established in rules adopted under section 4773.08 of the Revised Code may be increased in proportion to the amount of time beyond two years that the license may be valid. A license may be renewed. To be eligible for renewal, the license holder must complete the continuing education requirements specified in rules adopted by the department under section 4773.08 of the Revised Code. Applications for license renewal shall be accompanied by the appropriate renewal fee established in rules adopted under section 4773.08 of the Revised Code. Renewals shall be made in accordance with the standard renewal procedure established under Chapter 4745. of the Revised Code. (E)(1) A license that has lapsed or otherwise become inactive may be reinstated. An individual seeking reinstatement of a license shall apply to the department on a form the department shall prescribe and provide. The application shall be accompanied by the appropriate reinstatement fee established in rules adopted under section 4773.08 of the Revised Code. (2) To be eligible for reinstatement, both of the following apply: (a) An applicant must continue to meet the conditions for receiving an initial license, including the examination or certification requirements specified in division (B) or (C) of this section. In the case of an applicant seeking reinstatement based on having passed an examination administered under section 4773.04 of the Revised Code, the length of time that has elapsed since the examination was passed is not a consideration in determining whether the applicant is eligible for reinstatement. (b) The applicant must complete the continuing education requirements for reinstatement established in rules adopted under section 4773.08 of the Revised Code. (F) The department shall refuse to issue, renew, or reinstate and may suspend or revoke a general x-ray machine operator, radiographer, radiation therapy technologist, or nuclear medicine technologist license if the applicant or license holder does not comply with the applicable requirements of this chapter or rules adopted under it. (G) The department shall issue a general x-ray machine operator, radiographer, radiation therapy technologist, or nuclear medicine technologist license in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an applicant if either of the following applies: (1) The applicant holds a license in another state. (2) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a general x-ray machine operator, radiographer, radiation therapy technologist, or nuclear medicine technologist in a state that does not issue that license. Sec. 4773.06. (A) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, a general x-ray machine operator may perform radiologic procedures only if a physician, podiatrist, mechanotherapist, or chiropractor, certified nurse practitioner, or physician assistant is providing direct supervision. Direct supervision does not require the practitioner to observe each radiologic procedure performed by the operator, but does require that the practitioner to be present at the location where the operator is performing radiologic procedures for purposes of consulting with and directing the operator while performing the procedures. A practitioner supervising a general x-ray machine operator may authorize the operator to perform only those radiologic procedures that are within the practitioner's scope of practice as determined by the laws under which the practitioner is authorized to practice. (B) A radiographer, radiation therapy technologist, or nuclear medicine technologist may perform radiologic procedures only if a physician is providing general supervision. General supervision does not require the physician to observe each radiologic procedure performed or to be present at the location where the procedure is being performed, but does require that the physician to be readily available for purposes of consulting with and directing the individual while performing the procedures. (C) A general x-ray machine operator who is licensed under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code to practice as a registered nurse and is providing occupational health nursing services in an industrial workplace may perform radiologic procedures under a physician's general supervision, as described in division (B) of this section. This division does not subject a registered nurse who is also a certified nurse practitioner to a requirement to be supervised. Section 2. That existing sections 4773.01, 4773.02, 4773.03, and 4773.06 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.